Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.140

Immunization program—State board of health rules, contents.

The state board of health shall adopt and is hereby empowered to adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW which establish the procedural and substantive requirements for full immunization and the form and substance of the proof thereof, to be required pursuant to RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170.

[ 1990 c 33 s 198; 1984 c 40 s 9; 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.31.116.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 40: See note following RCW 28A.195.050.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 118: See notes following RCW 28A.210.060.